District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

9-1215.01

Establishment of the Make a Difference Selection Committee.

Repealed.

Apr. 30, 1998, D.C. Law 12-98, § 2, 45 DCR 1519
June 12, 1999, D.C. Law 12-285, § 4(g), 46 DCR 1355
Apr. 12, 2000, D.C. Law 13-91, § 141, 47 DCR 520
May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-271, § 258, 62 DCR 1884
1981 Ed., § 7-231.
D.C. Law 13-91, in subsec. (b), substituted “consist” for “consists”.
For temporary amendment of section, see § 4(g) of the Confirmation Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-25, March 15, 1999, 46 DCR 2971.
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 4(g) of the Confirmation Act Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-92, June 4, 1999, 46 DCR 5330).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 258 of the New Columbia Statehood Initiative, Omnibus Boards and Commissions, and Election Transition Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-481, Nov. 18, 2014, 61 DCR 12133, 20 STAT 4405).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 258 of the New Columbia Statehood Initiative, Omnibus Boards and Commissions, and Election Transition Reform Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-7, Feb. 26, 2015, 62 DCR 2646, 21 STAT 807).